District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.11

Rules.

(a)

The Office of Administrative Hearings, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of § 42-3141.06.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of §§ 42-3141.02, 42-3141.03, 42-3141.04, 42-3141.05, 42-3141.07, 42-3141.08, 42-3141.09, and 42-3141.10.

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 12, 57 DCR 4353
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 12 of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).